Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.052

First-class cities operating electrical facilities—Participation in agreements to use or own high voltage transmission facilities and other electrical generating facilities—Terms—Limitations.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1253-S.SL) ***

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, cities of the first class which operate electric generating facilities and distribution systems shall have power and authority to participate and enter into agreements for the use or undivided ownership of high voltage transmission facilities and capacity rights in those facilities and for the undivided ownership of any type of electric generating plants and facilities, including, but not limited to, nuclear and other thermal power generating plants and facilities and transmission facilities including, but not limited to, related transmission facilities, to be called "common facilities"; and for the planning, financing, acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance with: (a) Each other; (b) electrical companies which are subject to the jurisdiction of the Washington utilities and transportation commission or the regulatory commission of any other state, to be called "regulated utilities"; (c) rural electric cooperatives, including generation and transmission cooperatives in any state; (d) municipal corporations, utility districts, or other political subdivisions in any state; and (e) any agency of the United States authorized to generate or transmit electrical energy. It shall be provided in such agreements that each city shall use or own a percentage of any common facility equal to the percentage of the money furnished or the value of property supplied by it for the acquisition and construction of or additions or improvements to the facility and shall own and control or provide for the use of a like percentage of the electrical transmission or output.

(2) A city using or owning common facilities under this section may issue revenue bonds or other obligations to finance the city's share of the use or ownership of the common facilities.

(3) Cities of the first class shall have the power and authority to participate and enter into agreements for the use or undivided ownership of a coal-fired thermal electric generating plant and facility placed in operation before July 1, 1975, including related common facilities, and for the planning, financing, acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance of the plant and facility. It shall be provided in such agreements that each city shall use or own a percentage of any common facility equal to the percentage of the money furnished or the value of property supplied by the city for the acquisition and construction of or additions or improvements to the facility and shall own and control or provide for the use of a like percentage of the electrical transmission or output of the facility. Cities may enter into agreements under this subsection with each other, with regulated utilities, with rural electric cooperatives, with utility districts, with electric companies subject to the jurisdiction of the regulatory commission of any other state, and with any power marketer subject to the jurisdiction of the federal energy regulatory commission.

(4) The agreement must provide that each participant shall defray its own interest and other payments required to be made or deposited in connection with any financing undertaken by it to pay its percentage of the money furnished or value of property supplied by it for the planning, acquisition, and construction of any common facility, or any additions or betterments. The agreement shall provide a uniform method of determining and allocating operation and maintenance expenses of a common facility.

(5) Each city participating in the ownership, use, or operation of a common facility shall pay all taxes chargeable to its share of the common facility and the electric energy generated under any applicable statutes and may make payments during preliminary work and construction for any increased financial burden suffered by any county or other existing taxing district in the county in which the common facility is located, under agreement with such county or taxing district.

(6) In carrying out the powers granted in this section, each such city shall be severally liable only for its own acts and not jointly or severally liable for the acts, omissions, or obligations of others. No money or property supplied by any such city for the planning, financing, acquisition, construction, operation, or maintenance of, or addition or improvement to any common facility shall be credited or otherwise applied to the account of any other participant therein, nor shall the undivided share of any city in any common facility be charged, directly or indirectly, with any debt or obligation of any other participant or be subject to any lien as a result thereof. No action in connection with a common facility shall be binding upon any city unless authorized or approved by resolution or ordinance of its governing body.

(7) Any city acting jointly outside the state of Washington, by mutual agreement with any participant under authority of this section, shall not acquire properties owned or operated by any public utility district, by any regulated utility, or by any public utility owned by a municipality without the consent of the utility owning or operating the property, and shall not participate in any condemnation proceeding to acquire such properties.

[ 1997 c 230 s 1; 1992 c 11 s 1; 1989 c 249 s 1.]